Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB179.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Whole Milk in Pennsylvania Schools Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Pennsylvania milk." Raw milk produced by the milking of cows physically located within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth, transported to a dairy processing facility located within the geographic boundaries of this Commonwealth and processed as fluid milk into containers intended for distribution to consumers.1234567891011121314151617 "Pennsylvania school." A school district, cyber charter school, charter school, regional charter school, area career and technical school or intermediate unit located within this Commonwealth."Reduced fat Pennsylvania milk." Pennsylvania milk containing 2% milk fat. The term includes Pennsylvania milk that has been flavored."Whole Pennsylvania milk." Pennsylvania milk containing at least 3% milk fat. The term includes Pennsylvania milk that has been flavored.Section 3. Milk deemed in stream of intrastate commerce.Pennsylvania milk that is offered for sale to a Pennsylvania school shall be deemed to be in the stream of intrastate commerce.Section 4. Provision or sale of Pennsylvania milk in Pennsylvania schools.Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the school board or other governing entity of a Pennsylvania school may elect to utilize funds from State or local sources to obtain whole Pennsylvania milk or reduced fat Pennsylvania milk to provide or sell at the Pennsylvania school.Section 5. Duties of Secretary of Education.The Secretary of Education shall notify the superintendent or chief administrator of each Pennsylvania school of the provisions of this act.Section 6. Right of civil action.The Office of Attorney General shall, on behalf of a Pennsylvania school, bring a civil action against the Federal Government or any other entity to recover funds withheld or revoked as a result of an action taken by the school board or 20250HB0179PN0858 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other governing entity of the Pennsylvania school under section 4.Section 7. Reporting.No later than two years after the effective date of this section, the Secretary of Education, in consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture and the Pennsylvania Milk Board, shall issue a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall include all of the following information:(1) A list of Pennsylvania schools that have elected to provide or sell Pennsylvania milk under section 4.(2) The approximate increase or decrease in the consumption of fluid milk at Pennsylvania schools since the effective date of this section.(3) Actions taken by the Commonwealth to promote whole milk and reduced fat milk availability in Pennsylvania schools.(4) Any other information deemed relevant by the Secretary of Education, the Secretary of Agriculture or the Pennsylvania Milk Board for the purposes of this act.Section 8. Expiration.(a) Notice.--The Secretary of Education shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin upon the occurrence of any of the following:(1) The amendment or repeal of 42 U.S.C. § 1758(a)(2)(A) (relating to program requirements), which results in the availability of whole milk or reduced fat milk, flavored or 20250HB0179PN0858 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unflavored, in elementary and secondary schools in this Commonwealth.(2) An update to the Dietary Guidelines for Americans published under 7 U.S.C. § 5341 (relating to establishment of dietary guidelines), which permits the availability of whole milk or reduced fat milk, flavored or unflavored, in elementary and secondary schools in this Commonwealth.(b) Expiration.--This act shall expire on the date of publication of the notice under subsection (a).Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0179PN0858 - 4 - 1234567891011